Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
CHAPTER 423 Notaries Public and Commissioners of Foreign Deeds
423.380.
Journal of online notary public — Entries — Audio-visual recording — Lost or stolen journal — Retention and transmission — Custodian.

An online notary public shall maintain a journal in which the online notary public chronicles all electronic notarizations that the online notary public performs. The online notary public shall retain the journal for ten (10) years after the performance of the last electronic notarization chronicled in the journal.

The journal shall be created in an electronic format. An online notary public may maintain more than one (1) journal to chronicle electronic notarizations. The journal shall be maintained in an electronic format in a permanent, tamper-evident electronic format complying with administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

423.415

.

An entry in a journal shall be made contemporaneously with performance of the notarial act and contain the following information:

The date and time of the notarial act;

A brief description of the record, if any, and type of notarial act as authorized in KRS

423.310

;

The full name and address of each individual for whom the notarial act is performed;

If identity of the individual is based on personal knowledge, a statement to that effect;

If identity of the individual is based on satisfactory evidence, a brief description of the method of identification and the identification and the means used as well as the date of issuance and expiration of any identification credential presented; and

The fee, if any, charged by the online notary public.

If a notarial act involves the use of communication technology, the notary public shall retain the audio-visual recording of the performance of the notarial act in compliance with both KRS 423.355(7) and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

423.415

.

If a notary public’s journal is lost or stolen, the notary public promptly shall notify the Secretary of State on discovering that the journal is lost or stolen.

On resignation from, or the revocation or suspension of, a notary public’s commission, the notary public shall retain the notary public’s journal in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

On the death or adjudication of incompetency of a current or former notary public, the notary public’s personal representative or guardian or any other person knowingly in possession of the journal shall transmit it to the Secretary of State or otherwise as directed in administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

423.415

.

A notary public may designate a custodian to do any of the following:

Maintain the journal required under subsection (1) of this section; or

Retain an audio or visual recording of a notarial act required under subsection (4) of this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 17, effective January 1, 2020.

423.385.
Registration regarding electronic records and notarizations — Tamper-evident technology — Standards — Tangible copy of electronic record.

A notary public shall register with the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

423.390

if the notary public intends to perform notarial acts:

With respect to electronic records where the individual will appear before the notary in the notary’s physical presence; or

As an online notary public to perform electronic notarizations by means of communication technology.

A notary public may select one (1) or more tamper-evident technologies to perform notarial acts in the physical presence of the individual signer with respect to electronic records, or to perform electronic notarizations. A person may not require a notary public to perform any notarial act with a technology that the notary public has not selected.

If the Secretary of State has established standards respecting technology to perform notarial acts in the physical presence of the individual signer with respect to electronic records, or to perform electronic notarizations, the technology chosen by the notary public shall conform to those standards.

A tangible copy of an electronic record containing a notarial certificate may be accepted as satisfying any requirement that a record accepted for recording be an original, if the notarial officer executing the notarial certificate certifies that the tangible copy is an accurate copy of the electronic record.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 18, effective January 1, 2020.

423.390.
Commission as notary public — Requirements — Oath and filing — Surety bond — Change of information — Renewal of commission — Administrative regulations — Registration.

An individual qualified under subsection (2) of this section may apply to the Secretary of State for a commission as a notary public. The applicant shall comply with and provide the information required by administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State and be accompanied by payment of the specified fee.

An applicant for a commission as a notary public shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen or permanent legal resident of the United States;

Be a resident of or have a place of employment or practice in the county within this Commonwealth where the application is made;

Be able to read and write English;

Not be disqualified to receive a commission under KRS

423.395

;

Submit to the Secretary of State any application forms, information, disclosures, and verifications as are required by administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State;

Submit to the Secretary of State proof of having obtained the requisite surety bond required under subsection (4) of this section;

Take an oath of office as set forth in in subsection (4) of this section; and

Submit a fee payment, as specified in KRS

423.430

, made payable to the State Treasurer.

On compliance with this section, the Secretary of State shall issue a commission as a notary public to an applicant for a term of four (4) years. The Secretary of State shall assign a unique commission number to each notary public, which same commission number shall continue to be assigned to the notary public in the event of the renewal or later issuance of another commission to the same individual notary public.

Within thirty (30) days of receiving a notary public commission from the Secretary of State, the applicant shall appear in person to take an oath of office, submit an assurance in the form of a surety bond, and file the commission, all of which shall take place before the county clerk listed in the commission application. The applicant shall pay fees to the county clerk for filing the assurance and administering the oath as set forth in KRS

64.012

.

The assurance required by this section shall be in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be issued by a surety or other entity licensed or authorized to do business in this state. The assurance shall cover acts performed during the term of the notary public’s commission and shall be in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State. If a notary public violates the law with respect to notaries public in this state, the surety or issuing entity is liable under the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall give thirty (30) days’ notice to the Secretary of State before canceling the assurance or of the assurance’s expiration if such expiration is prior to the date of expiration of the notary’s commission. A notary public may perform notarial acts in this state only during the period that a valid assurance is on file with the county clerk.

A notarial officer may perform a notarial act in any county of the Commonwealth after filing the commission and assurance and taking the oath required by this section, and for so long as the notary public’s commission and surety bond are valid and in effect.

If, at any time during his or her period of commission under this section, or period of registration under subsection (10) of this section, a notary public changes his or her mail or electronic mail address, county of residence, name, signature, electronic signature, or the technology or device used to perform notarial acts or to maintain his or her journal or to render electronic documents tamper-evident, the notary public shall, within ten (10) days after making the change, submit to the Secretary of State the changed information upon the form and containing all information required by the Secretary of State, along with a fee payment, as specified in KRS

423.430

, payable to the State Treasurer.

Prior to the expiration of his or her commission period, a notary public may apply to the Secretary of State to renew his or her commission, and shall comply with the qualifications, renewal application filings, and other requirements then applicable to obtaining an original commission from the Secretary of State. The application for commission renewal shall be accompanied by a fee payment, as specified in KRS

423.430

, made payable to the State Treasurer.

If approved, the Secretary of State shall issue a renewed commission to the notary public for an additional four (4) year term, using the same commission number as the notary public’s original commission and indicating the new commission expiration date.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the commission along with the required assurance shall be filed with the county clerk listed in the renewal application, and a new oath of office administered by the county clerk and new fees paid by the notary public to the county clerk, as determined by KRS

64.012

.

A renewed commission shall be valid and effective only upon compliance with this subsection. A notary public shall have no authority to perform notarial acts during any period between the expiration of his or her current commission and the effective date of any renewal commission.

A commission to act as a notary public shall authorize the notary public to perform notarial acts. The commission shall not provide the notary public with any immunity or benefit conferred by the law of this state on public officials or employees.

Before performing an initial notarial act with respect to electronic records, or before performing an initial online notarial act, a notary public shall first register with the Secretary of State. The notary public shall:

At the time of registration, be a commissioned notary public in this Commonwealth who has complied with the requirements set forth in subsections (1) to (8) of this section, and who has complied with all applicable notarial requirements set forth in this chapter;

Register with the Secretary of State by submitting an electronic registration pursuant to this subsection;

Pay to the Secretary of State a registration fee payment, as specified in KRS

423.430

, which is in addition to the commission application fee required to be a notarial officer in this state and any fees required to be paid to the county clerk to file a commission and assurance and to take an oath pursuant to KRS

62.010

;

Submit to the Secretary of State any registration forms, information, disclosures, and verifications required by administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State; and

Submit to the Secretary of State with the registration proof satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the registrant has satisfied the requirement to post an assurance as a notary public, as set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

The Secretary of State shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish forms and procedures applicable to the registrations governed by subsection (10) of this section, and shall obtain at least the following information in connection with each registration:

The registrant’s commission number and full legal name as it appears on the registrant’s commission, and the name to be used for registration, if different;

The county in this state in which the registrant resides or has his or her place of employment or practice;

The electronic mail and resident address of the registrant;

Whether the registrant is registering to perform one (1) or both of the following:

Notarial acts with respect to electronic records in which the individual will appear before the notary in the notary’s physical presence; or

As an online notary public to perform electronic notarizations;

A description of the technologies or devices that the registrant intends to use to perform notarial acts with respect to electronic records or electronic notarizations, to maintain the journal required by KRS

423.380

, and to render electronic records tamper-evident after a notarial act is completed, each of which technologies or devices shall comply with any standards established by the Secretary of State;

The digital certification of the registrant; and

Any other information, evidence, disclosures, or declarations required or deemed beneficial by the Secretary of State pursuant to any administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State may reject a registration if the applicant fails to comply with any provision of KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

Thirty (30) days after compliance with all registration requirements and payment of the required registration fee, a notary public will be registered with the Secretary of State to perform notarial acts in the physical presence of an individual signer with respect to electronic records, or to perform electronic notarizations as an online notary public, or as both.

The Secretary of State may at any time cancel the registration of a notary public to perform notarial acts with respect to electronic records, or as an online notary public to perform electronic notarizations, if the notary public fails to comply with any of the requirements of KRS

423.300

to

423.455

or based upon any of the grounds for revocation or suspension of a notary public’s commission.

Registration of a notary public under this section is suspended by operation of law when the notary public is no longer commissioned as a notary public in this state. If the commission of a notary public has expired or been revoked or suspended, the Secretary of State shall immediately notify the notary public in writing that his or her registration under this section will be suspended by operation of law until he or she is appointed as a notary public in this Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 19, effective January 1, 2020.

423.395.
Denial, revocation, or limitation of commission — Other remedies.

The Secretary of State may deny, refuse to renew, revoke, suspend, or impose a condition on a commission as notary public for any act or omission that demonstrates the individual lacks the honesty, integrity, competence, or reliability to act as a notary public, including:

Failure to comply with KRS

423.300

to

423.455

;

A fraudulent, dishonest, or deceitful misstatement or omission in the application for a commission as a notary public submitted to the Secretary of State;

A conviction of the applicant or notary public of any felony or a crime involving fraud, dishonesty, or deceit;

A finding against, or admission of liability by, the applicant or notary public in any legal proceeding or disciplinary action based on the applicant’s or notary public’s fraud, dishonesty, or deceit;

Failure by the notary public to discharge any duty required of a notary public, whether by KRS

423.300

to

423.455

, administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State, or any federal or state law;

Use of false or misleading advertising or representation by the notary public representing that the notary has a duty, right, or privilege that the notary does not have;

Violation by the notary public of an administrative regulation of the Secretary of State regarding a notary public;

Denial, refusal to renew, revocation, or suspension of a notary public commission in another state; or

Failure of the notary public to maintain an assurance.

The authority of the Secretary of State to deny, refuse to renew, suspend, revoke, or impose conditions on a commission as a notary public does not prevent a person from seeking and obtaining other criminal or civil remedies provided by law.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 20, effective January 1, 2020.

423.400.
Electronic database of notaries public — County clerk to record filing and oath.

The Secretary of State shall maintain an electronic database of notaries public:

Through which a person may verify the authority of a notary public to perform notarial acts; and

Which indicates whether a notary public has registered with the Secretary of State in order to perform notarial acts on electronic records or to act as an online notary public.

Each county clerk who files a notary public’s assurance and administers the oath of office to a notary public shall promptly record the fact and date in the database described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 21, effective January 1, 2020.

423.405.
Unauthorized actions.

A commission as a notary public does not authorize an individual to engage in the practice of law.

A notary public shall not engage in false or deceptive advertising.

A notary public, other than an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, shall not advertise or represent that the notary public may assist persons in drafting legal records, give legal advice, or otherwise engage in the unauthorized practice of law as defined by rule of the Supreme Court.

Except as otherwise allowed by law, a notary public shall not withhold access to or possession of an original record provided by a person that seeks performance of a notarial act by the notary public.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 22, effective January 1, 2020.

423.410.
Validity of notarial act.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 423.310(4), the failure of a notarial officer to perform a duty or meet a requirement specified in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

does not invalidate a notarial act performed by the notarial officer. The validity of a notarial act does not prevent an aggrieved person from seeking to invalidate the record or transaction that is the subject of the notarial act or from seeking other remedies based on other laws of this state. This section does not validate a purported notarial act performed by an individual who does not have the authority to perform notarial acts.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 23, effective January 1, 2020.

423.415.
Administrative regulations.

The Secretary of State may promulgate administrative regulations to implement KRS

423.300

to

423.455

. Promulgated administrative regulations regarding the performance of notarial acts with respect to electronic records or electronic notarizations shall not require, or accord greater legal status or effect to, the implementation or application of a specific technology or technical specification. The administrative regulations may:

Prescribe the manner of performing notarial acts regarding tangible and electronic records;

Establish requirements for notarial training or education as a condition of obtaining or renewing a commission or before registering to perform notarial acts with respect to electronic records or to perform electronic notarizations;

Include provisions to ensure that any change to or tampering with a record bearing a certificate of a notarial act is self-evident;

Include provisions to ensure integrity in the creation, transmittal, storage, or authentication of electronic records or signatures;

Prescribe the process of granting, renewing, conditioning, denying, suspending, or revoking a notary public commission and assuring the trustworthiness of an individual holding a commission as notary public;

Include provisions to prevent fraud or mistake in the performance of notarial acts; and

Establish the process for approving and accepting surety bonds and other forms of assurance under KRS

423.390

.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 24, effective January 1, 2020.

423.420.
Commission in effect on January 1, 2020 — Renewal — Registration as online notary public.

A commission as a notary public in effect on January 1, 2020, shall continue until its date of expiration. A notary public who applies to renew a commission as a notary public on or after January 1, 2020, shall be subject to and comply with KRS

423.300

to

423.455

. A notary public, in performing notarial acts after January 1, 2020, shall comply with KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

An existing commission as a notary public does not constitute authority to act as an online notary public. Registration pursuant to KRS

423.390

, and compliance with KRS

423.300

to

423.455

, is required before a notary public with an existing commission may act as an online notary public.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 25, effective January 1, 2020.

423.425.
Validity of notarial act performed before January 1, 2020.

KRS

423.300

to

423.455

does not affect the validity or effect of a notarial act performed before January 1, 2020.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 26, effective January 1, 2020.

423.430.
Fees.

For a notarial act relating to a tangible or electronic record, or for an electronic notarization, a notary public may charge a fee:

In compliance with KRS

64.300

; and

Which has been clearly disclosed to the person requesting the service in advance.

Compensation for services provided by a notary public which do not constitute notarial acts is not governed by this section.

The Secretary of State may charge the following fees in relation to notaries public:

Application for a commission or renewal as a notary public . . . . . $10

Issuance of a replacement commission upon loss or destruction of the original . . . . . $10

Update to commission or registration information upon a change of name or address or other specified information . . . . . $10

Issuance of an electronic certificate of authority or apostille . . . . . $5 per document

In accordance with KRS

64.012

, county clerks may assess fees for services required to fulfill obligations set forth in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 27, effective January 1, 2020.

423.435.
Electronic record or paper printout relating to real property deemed to be lawfully recorded or filed.

If an electronic record or paper printout of an electronic record relating to real property located in this state contains an acknowledgment performed by electronic means, notwithstanding any omission or error in the certificate of acknowledgment or failure of the record to show an acknowledgment in compliance with applicable law, upon the record being recorded with the county clerk of the county in which the real property is located or filed with the Secretary of State:

The electronic record or paper printout of an electronic record shall be deemed to be lawfully recorded or filed; and

All persons, including without limitation any creditor, encumbrancer, mortgagee, subsequent purchaser for valuable consideration, or any other subsequent transferee thereof or of any interest therein, are deemed to have notice of its contents.

For the purposes of this section, a record is deemed to comply with all applicable requirements upon the recording by the county clerk of the county in which the real property is located or the filing of the record with the Secretary of State, as required by law.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 28, effective January 1, 2020.

423.440.
Presumption of proper notarization — Immunity of county clerk.

A writing or record that appears on its face to have been properly notarized in accordance with KRS

423.300

to

423.455

shall be presumed to have been notarized properly and may be recorded by the clerk.

A writing or record notarized outside this state by a notary public or other person referenced in KRS

423.345

or

423.350

that appears on its face to be properly notarized shall be presumed to have been notarized properly in accordance with the laws and regulations of the jurisdiction in which the document was notarized.

The county clerk shall be immune from suit arising from any acts or omissions relating to recording records that have been notarized by electronic means as set forth in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

unless the clerk was grossly negligent or engaged in willful misconduct.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 29, effective January 1, 2020.

423.445.
Application of Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

KRS

423.300

to

423.455

are to be construed and applied in a manner consistent with KRS

369.101

to

369.120

. In accordance with KRS

369.105

, nothing in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

shall affirmatively require any person to create, generate, send, communicate, receive, store, or otherwise process or use electronic records or complete a transaction using electronic means, and in accordance with KRS

369.118

, nothing shall require any governmental agency to send and accept electronic records and electronic signatures to and from other persons, or to otherwise create, generate, communicate, store, process, use, and rely upon electronic records and electronic signatures, except as may be otherwise required by law.

A requirement that a record or a signature associated with a record be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under oath is satisfied by a paper printout of an electronic record bearing an electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act and all other information required to be included pursuant to KRS

369.111

.

In accordance with KRS

369.118

, a governmental agency that accepts paper printouts of electronic records may establish rules, procedures, or requirements governing this acceptance.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 30, effective January 1, 2020.

423.450.
Certificate verifying notary public’s signature — Electronic certificate of authority.

With respect only to notarial acts performed in relation to tangible records, the county clerk of a county in whose office any notary public has so filed his or her signature and surety bond shall when requested subjoin to any certificate of proof or acknowledgment signed by the notary a certificate under his or her hand and seal stating that such notary public’s written signature is on file in the clerk’s office, and was at the time of taking such proof or acknowledgment duly authorized to take the same, that the clerk is well acquainted with the handwriting of the notary public, and believes that the signature to the proof or acknowledgment is genuine.

For all notarial acts performed in relation to electronic records that are transmitted to another state or nation, electronic evidence of the authenticity of the official signature and seal of a notary public of this state, if required, shall be attached to, or logically associated with, the record and shall be in the form of an electronic certificate of authority signed by the Office of the Secretary of State in conformance with any current and pertinent international treaties, agreements, and conventions subscribed to by the United States.

An electronic certificate of authority evidences the authenticity of the official signature and seal of an online notary public of this state and shall contain substantially the following:

“Certificate of Authority for a Notarial Act I, (name), Secretary of State of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, certify that (name of electronic notary), the person named as a Notary Public in the attached or associated electronic document, was indeed commissioned as a Notary Public for the Commonwealth of Kentucky and authorized to act as such at the time of the document’s electronic notarization. To verify this Certificate of Authority for a Notarial Act, I have included herewith my electronic signature this day of , (year).

Click to view(Electronic signature and seal of the Kentucky Secretary of State)”

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 31, effective January 1, 2020.

423.455.
Notarial act for remotely located individual facilitated by communication technology — Certificate — Retention of audio-visual recording — Notification of Secretary of State — Administrative regulations — Service of process.

A remotely located individual may comply with KRS

423.320

by appearing before a notary public by means of communication technology.

A notary public located in this state may perform a notarial act facilitated by communication technology for a remotely located individual if:

The notary public:

Has personal knowledge pursuant to KRS 423.325(1) of the identity of the individual;

Has satisfactory evidence of the identity of the remotely located individual by oath or affirmation from a credible witness appearing before the notary public under KRS 423.325(2); or

Reasonably can identify the individual by at least two (2) different types of identity-proofing processes or services;

The notary public is able reasonably to identify a record before the notary public as the same record in which the remotely located individual made a statement or on which the remotely located individual executed a signature;

The notary public, or a person acting on behalf of the notary public, creates an audio-visual recording of the performance of the notarial act; and

For a remotely located individual who is located outside the United States:

The record:

Is to be filed with or relates to a matter before a court, governmental entity, public official, or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; or

Involves property located in the territorial jurisdiction of the United States or a transaction substantially connected with the United States; and

The act of making the statement or signing the record is not prohibited by the foreign state in which the remotely located individual is located.

If a notarial act is performed pursuant to this section, the certificate of notarial act required by KRS

423.360

and the short-form certificate provided in KRS

423.365

shall indicate that the notarial act was performed by means of communication technology.

A short-form certificate provided in KRS

423.365

for a notarial act subject to this section is sufficient if it:

Complies with administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (7)(a) of this section; or

Is in the form provided by KRS

423.365

and contains a statement substantially as follows: “This notarial act involved the use of communication technology.”

A notary public, a guardian, a conservator, or agent of a notary public, or a personal representative of a deceased notary public shall retain the audio-visual recording created under subsection (2)(c) of this section or cause the recording to be retained by a repository designated by or on behalf of the person required to retain the recording. Unless a different period is required by administrative regulations promulgated under subsection (7)(d) of this section, the recording shall be retained for no less than ten (10) years after the recording is made.

Before a notary public performs the notary public’s initial notarial act under this section, the notary public shall notify the Secretary of State that the notary public will be performing notarial acts facilitated by communication technology and identify the technology. If the Secretary of State has established standards for approval of communication technology or identity proofing under subsection (7) of this section, the communication technology and identity proofing shall conform to those standards.

In addition to promulgating administrative regulations under KRS

423.415

, the Secretary of State may promulgate administrative regulations regarding performance of a notarial act. The administrative regulations may:

Prescribe the means of performing a notarial act involving a remotely located individual using communication technology;

Establish standards for communication technology and identity proofing;

Establish requirements or procedures to approve providers of communication technology and the process of identity proofing; and

Establish standards and a period of the retention of an audio-visual recording created under subsection (2)(c) of this section.

Before promulgating administrative regulations governing performance of a notarial act with respect to a remotely located individual, the Secretary of State shall consider:

The most recent standards regarding the performance of a notarial act with respect to a remotely located individual promulgated by national standard-setting organizations and the National Association of Secretaries of State;

Standards, practices, and customs of other jurisdictions that have laws substantially similar to this section; and

The views of governmental officials and entities and other interested persons.

By allowing its communication technology or identity proofing technology to facilitate a notarial act for a remotely located individual or by providing storage of the audio-visual recording created under subsection (2)(c) of this section, the provider of the technology appoints the Secretary of State as the provider’s agent for service of process in any civil action in this state related to the notarial act.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 32, effective January 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2020). Although
2019 Ky. Acts ch. 86, sec. 32, contained a citation to “Section 27 of this Act” (codified as
KRS

423.430

) in subsection (6) of this statute, it is clear from the context that a reference to subsection (7) of this statute was intended. Similarly, a citation to “Section 27 of this Act” in subsection (7) of this statute was clearly intended to refer to Section 24 (codified as
KRS

423.415

). These manifest clerical or typographical errors were corrected in codification under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

423.460.
Relation of KRS 382.075, 382.076, and 423.300 to 423.455 to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

KRS

382.075

,

382.076

, and

423.300

to

423.455

modify, limit, and supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et seq., but do not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001(c)

, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7003(b)

.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 35, effective January 1, 2020.

423.465.
Conflict between laws.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other law in this state, the provisions of this chapter shall control.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 36, effective January 1, 2020.

423.990.
Penalties. [Repealed]

History.

3727: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 427, effective January 2, 1978; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.